Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF879.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LAKES AREA POLICE COMMISSION; NEW LAW ENFORCEMENT CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the Lakes Area Police Commission to predesign, design, construct, furnish, and equip a new regional training and public safety facility for the Lakes Area Police Commission, a joint powers law enforcement agency created pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 471.59, to serve the cities of Lindstrom and Chisago City, and the surrounding area. This appropriation is not available until the commissioner of management and budget determines that $4,000,000 has been committed to complete the project from nonstate sources. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end